Arkansas statutes. Title 28 Wills, Estates, and Fiduciary Relationships
Chapter 8

General Provisions

28-8-101. Survivorship abolished.

All survivorships of real and personal estate are forever abolished.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 82, § 6; C. & M. Dig., § 6232; Pope's Dig., § 4351; A.S.A. 1947, § 61-114.

28-8-102. Declaration of heirs.

In all cases, when any person desires to make a person an heir at law, it shall be lawful to do so by a declaration in writing in favor of the person, to be acknowledged before any judge, justice of the peace, clerk of any court, or before any court of record in this state.

Before the declaration shall be of any force or effect, it shall be recorded in the county where the declarant may reside, or in the county where the person in whose favor such a declaration is made may reside.

Ark. L. Rev.

Domestic Relations — Adoption of Adults, 12 Ark. L. Rev. 199.

Legitimacy and Paternity, 14 Ark. L. Rev. 55.

The applicability of this section is not limited to situations where a person desires to make an illegitimate child his heir but applies to anyone that a person may desire to make his heir. Reed v. Billingslea, 226 Ark. 589, 291 S.W.2d 497 (1956).

A mere acknowledgment in writing by one person that another person is his illegitimate son or daughter is not sufficient to make the illegitimate person an heir of a father recognizing him as a son or daughter. Reed v. Billingslea, 226 Ark. 589, 291 S.W.2d 497 (1956).

A document which designates a named individual as the declarant's sole heir at law does not have to be filed before the declarant's death for it to be of any effect. Ricketts v. Ferrell, 283 Ark. 143, 671 S.W.2d 753 (1984).

Where father merely procured birth certificate for his illegitimate daughter at her request and signed it before a notary public but in no way indicated that he wished to make the daughter his heir, this was not sufficient to constitute a declaration in writing that he wished to make the daughter his heir. Reed v. Billingslea, 226 Ark. 589, 291 S.W.2d 497 (1956).

Sufficient showing adverse to a will to permit person claiming under this section to join in its contest. First Nat'l Bank v. Ary, 180 Ark. 1084, 24 S.W.2d 336 (1930).

Cited: Lucas v. Handcock, 266 Ark. 142, 583 S.W.2d 491 (1979).

Am. Jur. 23 Am. Jur. 2d, Desc. & D., § 1 et seq.

C.J.S. 26B C.J.S., Desc. & D., § 1 et seq.

[Reserved]

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1969, No. 303, § 26, provided, in part, that this subchapter would control, for purposes of intestate succession, the devolution of real and personal property of all persons dying totally or partially intestate after midnight, December 31, 1969, and that the laws repealed or superseded by this subchapter would remain in effect with respect to intestacies occurring prior to that date.

Cross References. Claims for nursing care, §28-13-103.

Effective Dates. Acts 1969, No. 303, § 26: midnight, Dec. 31, 1969.

Acts 1979, No. 1015, § 5: Apr. 18, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the U.S. Supreme Court in Trimble v. Gordon, 430 U.S. 762 (1977) found that a state's statutory prohibition of illegitimate children inheriting by intestate succession from their fathers while allowing legitimate children to inherit by intestate succession from both their fathers and mothers was constitutionally flawed under the Fourteenth Amendment's equal protection clause as discriminating against illegitimates where it excludes unnecessarily those categories of illegitimate children of intestate men for which inheritance rights can be recognized without jeopardizing the orderly settlement of estates or the dependability of titles to property passing under intestacy laws; that the Trimble decision, in effect, held that Arkansas Statute 61-141 (d) [see now §28-9-209] as presently written is unconstitutional under the equal protection clause as discriminating against illegitimates in that it prohibits absolutely any inheritance from the father; that this Act is designed to bring the Arkansas law relating to the rights of an illegitimate child to inherit from the father into conformity with the decision of the Court in the Trimble case and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1985, No. 703, § 8: Mar. 28, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that present law provides for escheated estates to become the property of the State; that due to the financial hardships facing counties it now appears more equitable to allow estates to escheat to the county wherein the decedent resided at death; that such property will continue to escheat to the State until this Act goes into effect. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1987, No. 847, § 3: Apr. 8, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that some confusion exists concerning the method of computing degrees of consanguinity under present Arkansas law; that Section 14 of Act 303 of 1969 was designed and intended to apply in computing degree of relationship between two kinsmen who are related laterally and not in a direct line of ascent or descent; that if the language of that section is applied in determining degrees of relationship to persons in a direct line of ascent or descent the result is impractical and unworkable; that the purpose of this Act is to prescribe a specific procedure for determining degrees of relationship between persons related in a direct line of ascent or descent and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

ALR.

Right to probate subsequently discovered will as affected by completed prior proceedings in intestate administration. 2 A.L.R.4th 1315.

Homicide as precluding taking under will or by intestacy. 25 A.L.R.4th 787.

Adopted children as subject to protection of statute regarding right of children pretermitted by will, or statute preventing disinheritance of child. 43 A.L.R.4th 947.

Rights of inheritance as between kindred of whole and half blood. 47 A.L.R.4th 561.

Ark. L. Rev.

The New Arkansas Inheritance Laws: A Step into the Present with an Eye to the Future, 23 Ark. L. Rev. 313.

Notes, Estate of Sargent v. Benton State Bank: Judicial Limitations on a Slayer's Right to Inherit from the Decedent, 38 Ark. L. Rev. 653.

Case Note, Cox v. Whitten: Limiting the Inheritance Rights of Adopted Adults, etc., 40 Ark. L. Rev. 627.

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Brantley and Effland, Inheritance, The Share of the Surviving Spouse, and Willis: Arkansas Law and the Uniform Probate Code Compared, 3 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 361.

Averill & Brantley, A Comparison of Arkansas's Current Law Concerning Succession, Wills, and Other Donative Transfers with Article II of the 1990 Uniform Probate Code, 17 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 631.

History.

Acts 1853, §§ 1, 2, p. 207; C. & M. Dig., §§ 3493, 3494; Pope's Dig., §§ 4361, 4362; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 61-301, 61-302.